SciBin2/dics/ru_RU.dic
адамантовый/CCCDCOSa
акцентуировавший/CCYYSa
ананасовый/CCCDCOSa
антитетический/CCZZSa
артикулировавший/CCYYSa
аффектированный/CCCDCOXXSa
балыковый/CCCDCOSa
безбрежный/CCCDCOSa
безызносный/CCSa
бесподвальный/CCSa
бинтующийся/CCYYSa
блинтуемый/CCCDSa
бореальный/CCSa
бронхографический/CCZZSa
буранный/CCCOCcSa
валкий/CCCDSa
ввязывавшийся/CCYYSa
вербализовавший/CCYYSa
вживлявшийся/CCYYSa
вздвоивший/CCYYSa
взъерошившийся/CCYYSa
вишневый/CCCDCOSa
влюблённый/CCCDCOXXSa
внушённый/CCXXSa
возглашающийся/CCYYSa
волокнистый/CCCDCOSa
воспаривший/CCYYSa
воющий/CCYYSa
врезывавшийся/CCYYSa
всосавший/CCYYSa
втачивающий/CCYYSa
выблевнутый/CCCDSa
выгадавший/CCYYSa
выезженный/CCXXSa
выкликавший/CCYYSa
вылеченный/CCXXSa
вымучившийся/CCYYSa
выплетший/CCYYSa
вырождавшийся/CCYYSa
высовывавший/CCYYSa
высуживавший/CCYYSa
вытуривший/CCYYSa
вышаркивавший/CCYYSa
газонепроницаемый/CCCDCOSa
генерирующий/CCYYSa
гипнотический/CCZZSa
гнойный/CCCDCOSa
городской/CCZZSa
греховный/CCCDCOSa
гудковый/CCCDCOSa
двенадцатиградусный/CCSa
двухсотенный/CCSa
декатировавший/CCYYSa
дергаемый/CCCDSa
диагностирующий/CCYYZZSa
дисциплинирующий/CCYYZZSa
довзыскавший/CCYYSa
дозвездный/CCSa
докушавший/CCYYSa
донжуанский/CCZZSa
доращенный/CCXXSa
достодолжный/CCCDCOSa
дочтенный/CCXXSa
дублинский/CCZZSa
езженый/CCCDCOSa
желчнокаменный/CCSa
заактированный/CCXXSa
забуксовавший/CCYYSa
заволакивавший/CCYYSa
загордившийся/CCYYSa
задразненный/CCXXSa
заигравший/CCYYSa
заклинивавшийся/CCYYSa
закупившийся/CCYYSa
замасливавшийся/CCYYSa
замутившийся/CCYYSa
запарывающий/CCYYSa
заполошный/CCCDCOSa
заразительный/CCCDCOSa
засекретничавший/CCYYSa
застекленный/CCXXSa
затаривающийся/CCYYSa
затрамбованный/CCXXSa
захлебывающийся/CCYYSa
зашаркавший/CCYYSa
звавший/CCYYSa
злоехидный/CCCDCOSa
зэковский/CCZZSa
извещенный/CCXXSa
иззубривающийся/CCYYSa
измызганный/CCXXSa
изруганный/CCXXSa
импрессионистический/CCZZSa
инсценированный/CCXXSa
исковеркавший/CCYYSa
исплевывающий/CCYYSa
истапливающийся/CCYYSa
исчерпывавший/CCYYSa
калиберный/CCSa
капотажный/CCCDCOSa
каторжный/CCCDCOSa
кипячёный/CCCDCOSa
клубничный/CCCDCOSa
коллизионный/CCCOCcSa
комплектный/CCCDCOSa
контокоррентный/CCCDCOSa
корёжащий/CCYYSa
костеренный/CCXXSa
кремнекислый/CCSa
кроящий/CCYYSa
культивировавший/CCYYSa
ладненький/CCZZSa
легчающий/CCYYSa
лимитированный/CCXXSa
локальный/CCCDCOSa
любопытствовавший/CCYYSa
малогабаритный/CCCDCOSa
манометрический/CCZZSa
махровевший/CCYYSa
мелиевые/CCSa
метатрофный/CCCDCOSa
минусинский/CCZZSa
многочелночный/CCCDCOSa
монотоварный/CCSa
мужественнейший/CCZZSa
мягчащий/CCYYSa
наверстывавший/CCYYSa
нагноенный/CCXXSa
надергивавший/CCYYSa
надтесанный/CCXXSa
наихилейший/CCSa
накрахмаливающий/CCYYSa
намачиваемый/CCCDSa
напарывающийся/CCYYSa
напрессовывающий/CCYYSa
нарытый/CCCDSa
насочинявший/CCYYSa
натасовавший/CCYYSa
нахаживаемый/CCCDSa
нашвыриваемый/CCCDSa
нейдущий/CCYYSa
нижеследующий/CCCDCOSa
новотельный/CCCDCOSa
обварившийся/CCYYSa
обдумывающийся/CCYYSa
обеспокоившийся/CCYYSa
обклеивающий/CCYYSa
облизывавшийся/CCYYSa
обмишулившийся/CCYYSa
ободривший/CCYYSa
обрезинивающий/CCYYSa
обслюнившийся/CCYYSa
обуваемый/CCCDSa
общенациональный/CCCDCOSa
оглуплённый/CCXXSa
однодольный/CCCDCOSa
ожидающийся/CCYYSa
оккупировавшийся/CCYYSa
окулировавший/CCYYSa
опекающийся/CCYYSa
опорочивавшийся/CCYYSa
опьяневший/CCYYSa
осёкшийся/CCYYSa
осовремениваемый/CCCDSa
осыпавший/CCYYSa
отвечавший/CCYYSa
отдавливаемый/CCCDSa
откачивавшийся/CCYYSa
отлавливающийся/CCYYSa
отмолотившийся/CCYYSa
отпекший/CCYYSa
отравлявшийся/CCYYSa
отскребавший/CCYYSa
оттапливаемый/CCCDSa
отхаркивающийся/CCYYSa
отштамповавший/CCYYSa
охранивший/CCYYSa
ощеривавший/CCYYSa
пантокринный/CCCOCcSa
паснувший/CCYYSa
пелёночный/CCCDCOSa
перебуженный/CCXXSa
перегибающийся/CCYYSa
передружившийся/CCYYSa
перекапчивавший/CCYYSa
перекристаллизованный/CCXXSa
перемежающий/CCYYSa
переномеровывавший/CCYYSa
перепихнутый/CCCDSa
перерасследовавший/CCYYSa
пересмеянный/CCXXSa
перетанцовывающий/CCYYSa
переучитывавший/CCYYSa
перештопанный/CCXXSa
пешечный/CCCDCOSa
планочный/CCCDCOSa
плотнейший/CCZZSa
побрякавший/CCYYSa
повременный/CCCOCcSa
погрузивший/CCYYSa
подвиливающий/CCYYSa
подебоширивший/CCYYSa
подклевывавший/CCYYSa
подлинявший/CCYYSa
подневный/CCSa
подползавший/CCYYSa
подсаливавший/CCYYSa
подстрачивающий/CCYYSa
подтыкающийся/CCYYSa
подштукатуривший/CCYYSa
позитивистский/CCZZSa
покомбинированный/CCXXSa
поливитаминный/CCSa
полуведёрный/CCCDCOSa
получивший/CCYYSa
помошенничавший/CCYYSa
поостренный/CCXXSa
попудривший/CCYYSa
портьерный/CCCDCOSa
послезародышевый/CCSa
построчный/CCCDCOSa
потребивший/CCYYSa
похоронный/CCCOCcSa
пощелкиванный/CCXXSa
предвесенний/CCSa
представимый/CCCDSa
преобразовательный/CCCDCOSa
прибавочный/CCCDCOSa
привораживающий/CCYYSa
приемлемый/CCCDCOSa
приколотый/CCCDSa
примерочный/CCCDCOSa
приостановивший/CCYYSa
припрядающий/CCYYSa
присоединивший/CCYYSa
притаскиваемый/CCCDSa
приутихавший/CCYYSa
пришпандоривающий/CCYYSa
провалявшийся/CCYYSa
проглядывающий/CCYYSa
продрожавший/CCYYSa
произрастающий/CCYYSa
прокорректировавший/CCYYSa
промешавший/CCYYSa
пропекшийся/CCYYSa
прорисовывающийся/CCYYSa
прослушиваемый/CCCDSa
просыпной/CCCOSa
протопатический/CCZZSa
прочеркнувший/CCYYSa
прямоугольный/CCCDCOSa
пухоочистительный/CCSa
раболепный/CCCDCOSa
разбронированный/CCXXSa
раздвоившийся/CCYYSa
размозживший/CCYYSa
разрывный/CCCDSa
раскочегаривший/CCYYSa
распубликовывавший/CCYYSa
растесывающий/CCYYSa
расшивающийся/CCYYSa
ремилитаризующийся/CCYYSa
ронявшийся/CCYYSa
самозаготовительный/CCSa
сачивший/CCYYSa
свежеприобретенный/CCXXSa
сгладываемый/CCCDSa
сентиментальничавший/CCYYSa
сказывавший/CCYYSa
скотоводческий/CCZZSa
слупливавший/CCYYSa
снёсший/CCYYSa
сонатный/CCCDCOSa
сощипывающий/CCYYSa
сражавшийся/CCYYSa
стекавшийся/CCYYSa
стремившийся/CCYYSa
супружний/CCCDCOSa
сытый/CCCDCOSa
теологический/CCZZSa
толсторожий/CCCDCOSa
требовавший/CCYYSa
трубленный/CCXXSa
убелявшийся/CCYYSa
удалявший/CCYYSa
украинизированный/CCXXSa
умытый/CCCDSa
уретральный/CCCDCOSa
утекавший/CCYYSa
ушвыриваемый/CCCDSa
флоридиновый/CCCDCOSa
хватившийся/CCYYSa
хронический/CCZZSa
чашеобразный/CCCDCOSa
чистый/CCCDCoSa
шестиколесный/CCCDSa
штукатуреный/CCCDCOSa
экуменический/CCZZSa
языковый/CCCDCOSa
